Maryland, session 2025, HB0279.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Local Government
4–414.
(a) (1) The chief executive and administrative officer of a municipality that
has annexed property shall send a copy of the annexation resolution with the new
boundaries to:
(i) the clerk or similar official of the municipality;
(ii) the clerk of the court in any county in which the municipality is
located;
(iii) the Department of Legislative Services in accordance with
paragraph (2) of this subsection; [and]
(iv) THE DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING IN ACCORDANCE WITH
PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(V) for any municipality located in the regional district, the
Maryland–National Capital Park and Planning Commission.
– 1 –

Ch. 59 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) The annexation resolution shall be sent to the Department of
Legislative Services AND THE DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING within 10 days after the
resolution takes effect.
(b) Each official or agency that receives an annexation resolution under
subsection (a) of this section shall:
(1) keep on record the resolution with the new boundaries; and
(2) make the resolution available for public inspection during regular
business hours.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 8, 2025.
– 2 –